Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202676-2202
Legislative findings.

The Legislature finds that as a result of the enactment of the Dodd-Frank Wall Street Reform and Consumer Protection Act and the Financial Institutions Reform, Recovery, and Enforcement Act of 1989, Nebraska's laws providing for regulation of real property appraisers require restructuring and updating in order to comply with such acts. Compliance with the acts is necessary to ensure an adequate number of real property appraisers in Nebraska to conduct appraisals of real estate involved in federally related transactions as defined in such acts.

Laws 1990, LB 1153, § 2;

Laws 1991, LB 203, § 7;

Laws 1994, LB 1107, § 7;

Laws 2006, LB 778, § 14;

Laws 2010, LB931, § 1;

Laws 2012, LB714, § 1;

Laws 2014, LB717, § 2;

Laws 2015, LB139, § 2;

Laws 2016, LB731, § 1;

Laws 2018, LB741, § 2;

Laws 2020, LB808, § 53.